Utah statutes.
77-23-210.   Force used in executing warrant -- When notice of authority is required as a prerequisite.

When a search warrant has been issued authorizing entry into any building, room, conveyance, compartment, or other enclosure, the officer executing the warrant may use such force as is reasonably necessary to enter:

(1)  if, after notice of the officer's authority and purpose, there is no response or the officer is not admitted with reasonable promptness; or

(2)  without notice of the officer's authority and purpose, if the magistrate issuing the warrant directs in the warrant that the officer need not give notice.

